Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
ARTICLE 3
ALCOHOL BEVERAGES

Editor's note:

This article 3 was added with relocations in 2018. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article 3, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Law reviews.

For comment, "The Substantive Fallacy of the Twenty-first Amendment", see 61 Den. L.J. 235 (1984); for article, "Administrative Sanctions Against

C

olorado Liquor Licenses", see 30

C

olo. Law. 61 (Dec. 2001); for article, "Basics of Colorado Liquor Licensing Law", see 38 Colo. Law. 71 (Oct. 2009).

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY -
DUTIES

PART 3 STATE AND LOCAL LICENSING

PART 4 CLASSES OF LICENSES AND PERMITS

PART 5 LICENSE FEES AND EXCISE TAXES

PART 6 DISCIPLINARY ACTIONS

PART 7 INSPECTION OF BOOKS AND
RECORDS

PART 8 JUDICIAL REVIEW AND
CIVIL LIABILITY

PART 9 UNLAWFUL ACTS - ENFORCEMENT

PART 10 RESPONSIBLE ALCOHOL BEVERAGE VENDOR ACT